Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.405

Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program—Created—Purpose.

Consistent with the legislative findings in RCW 28A.300.390, the legislature shall establish the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The program provides grants for the purpose of establishing a legacy of remembrance as part of a continuing process of recovery from the World War II exclusion and detention of individuals of Japanese ancestry. The program is created to do one or both of the following:

(1) Educate the public regarding the history and the lessons of the World War II exclusion, removal, and detention of persons of Japanese ancestry through the development, coordination, and distribution of new educational materials and the development of curriculum materials to complement and augment resources currently available on this subject matter; and

(2) Develop videos, plays, presentations, speaker bureaus, and exhibitions for presentation to elementary schools, secondary schools, community colleges, and to other interested parties.

[ 2014 c 46 s 1; 2000 c 210 s 4.]